Utah statutes.
59-12-401.   Resort communities tax authority for cities, towns, and
military installation development authority -- Base -- Rate -- Collection
fees.
(1) (a)  In addition to other sales and use taxes, a city or town in which the
transient room capacity as defined in Section 59-12-405 is greater than or
equal to 66% of the municipality's permanent census population may impose a
sales and use tax of up to 1.1% on the transactions described in Subsection
59-12-103(1) located within the city or town.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a city or town may not impose a tax
under this section on:
(i)  the sale of:
(A)  a motor vehicle;
(B)  an aircraft;
(C)  a watercraft;
(D)  a modular home;
(E)  a manufactured home; or
(F)  a mobile home;
(ii)  the sales and uses described in Section 59-12-104 to the extent the
sales and uses are exempt from taxation under Section 59-12-104; and
(iii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(d), amounts paid or charged for
food and food ingredients.
(c)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), the location of a transaction shall
be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.
(d)  A city or town imposing a tax under this section shall impose the tax on
amounts paid or charged for food and food ingredients if the food and food
ingredients are sold as part of a bundled transaction attributable to food and
food ingredients and tangible personal property other than food and food
ingredients.
(2) (a)  An amount equal to the total of any costs incurred by the state in
connection with the implementation of Subsection (1) which exceed, in any
year, the revenues received by the state from its collection fees received in
connection with the implementation of Subsection (1) shall be paid over to the
state General Fund by the cities and towns which impose the tax provided for
in Subsection (1).
(b)  Amounts paid under Subsection (2)(a) shall be allocated proportionally
among those cities and towns according to the amount of revenue the respective
cities and towns generate in that year through imposition of that tax.
(3) (a)  Subject to 63H-1-203, the military installation development authority
created in Section 63H-1-201 may impose a tax under this section on the
transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) located within a project
area described in a project area plan adopted by the authority under Title
63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act, as though the
authority were a city or a town.
(b)  For purposes of calculating the permanent census population within a
project area, the board as defined in Section 63H-1-102 shall:
(i)  count the population;
(ii)  adopt a resolution verifying the population number; and
(iii)  provide the commission any information required in Section 59-12-405.
